California statutes. Labor Code
No report of injury or illness required by subdivision (a) of Section 6409.1 shall be open to public inspection or made public, nor shall those reports be admissible as evidence in any adversary proceeding before the Workers’ Compensation Appeals Board. However, the reports required of physicians by subdivision (a) of Section 6409 shall be admissible as evidence in the proceeding, except that no physician’s report shall be admissible as evidence to bar proceedings for the collection of compensation, and the portion of any physician’s report completed by an employee shall not be admissible as evidence in any proceeding before the Workers’ Compensation Appeals
 Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1019, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

6413.

(a) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, and every physician or surgeon who attends any injured state prisoner, shall file with the Division of Occupational Safety and Health a complete report, on forms prescribed under Sections 6409 and 6409.1, of every injury to each state prisoner, resulting from any labor performed by the prisoner unless disability resulting from such injury does not last
 through the day or does not require medical service other than ordinary first aid treatment.

(b) Where the injury results in death a report, in addition to the report required by subdivision (a), shall forthwith be made by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to the Division of Occupational Safety and Health by telephone or telegraph.

(c) Except as provided in Section 6304.2, nothing in this section or in this code shall be deemed to make a prisoner an employee, for any purpose, of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), no physician or surgeon who attends any injured state prisoner outside of a Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation institution shall be required to file the report required by subdivision (a), but the Department of Corrections and
 Rehabilitation shall file the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 113.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6413.2.

(a) With regard to any report required by Section 6413, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health may make recommendations to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation of ways in which the department might improve the safety of the working conditions and work areas of state prisoners, and other safety matters. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not be required to comply
 with these recommendations.

(b) With regard to any report required by Section 6413, the Division of Occupational Safety and Health may, in any case in which the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation has not complied with recommendations made by the division pursuant to subdivision (b), or in any other case in which the division deems the safety of any state prisoner shall require it, conduct hearings and, after these hearings, adopt special orders, rules, or regulations or otherwise proceed as authorized in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 6300) of this part as it deems necessary. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall comply with any order, rule, or regulation so adopted by the Division of Occupational Safety and Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 46, Sec. 114.   (SB 1038)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

6413.5.

Any employer or physician who fails to comply with any provision of subdivision (a) of Section 6409, or Section 6409.1, 6409.2, 6409.3, or 6410 may be assessed a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) by the director or his or her designee if he or she finds a pattern or practice of violations, or a willful violation of any of these provisions. Penalty assessments may be contested in the manner provided in Section 3725. Penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1019, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Penalties [6423. - 6436.]

6423.

(a) Except where another penalty is specifically provided, every employer and every officer, management official, or supervisor having direction, management, control, or custody of any employment, place of employment, or of any other employee, who does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(1) Knowingly or negligently violates any standard, order, or special order, or any provision of this division, or of any part thereof in, or authorized by, this part the violation of which is deemed to be a serious violation pursuant to Section 6432.

(2) Repeatedly violates any standard, order, or special order, or provision of this division, or any part thereof in, or authorized by, this part, which repeated violation creates a real and apparent hazard to employees.

(3) Knowingly fails to report to the division a death, as required by subdivision (b) of Section 6409.1.

(4) Fails or refuses to comply, after notification and expiration of any abatement period, with any such standard, order, special order, or provision of this division, or any part thereof, which failure or refusal creates a real and apparent hazard to employees.

(5) Directly or indirectly, knowingly induces another to commit any of the acts in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a).

(b) Any violation of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed six months, or by a fine not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(c) Any violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment in county jail for up to one year, or by a fine not to exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. If the violator is a corporation or a limited liability company, the fine prescribed by this subdivision may not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(d) Any violation of paragraph (2), (4), or (5) of subdivision (a) is punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine. If the defendant is a corporation or a limited liability company, the fine may not exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(e) In determining the amount of fine to impose under this section, the court shall consider all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of the violation, any prior history of violations by the defendant, the ability of the defendant to pay, and any other matters the court determines the interests of justice require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 885, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

6425.

(a) Any employer and any employee having direction, management, control, or custody of any employment, place of employment, or of any other employee, who willfully violates any occupational safety or health standard, order, or special order, or Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, and that violation caused death to any employee, or caused permanent or prolonged impairment of the body of any employee, is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine; or by imprisonment in the state prison for 16 months, or two or three years, or by a fine of not more than two hundred fifty
 thousand dollars ($250,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine; and in either case, if the defendant is a corporation or a limited liability company, the fine may not exceed one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000).

(b) If the conviction is for a violation committed within seven years after a conviction under subdivision (b), (c), or (d) of Section 6423 or subdivision (c) of Section 6430, punishment shall be by imprisonment in state prison for a term of 16 months, two, or three years, or by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, but if the defendant is a corporation or limited liability company, the fine may not be less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more than two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000).

(c) If the conviction is for a violation committed within seven
 years after a first conviction of the defendant for any crime involving a violation of subdivision (a), punishment shall be by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code for two, three, or four years, or by a fine not exceeding two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, but if the defendant is a corporation or a limited liability company, the fine shall not be less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) but may not exceed three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000).

(d) In determining the amount of fine to be imposed under this section, the court shall consider all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of the violation, any prior history of violations by the defendant, the ability of the defendant to pay, and any other matters the court determines the interests of justice require.

(e) As used in this section, “willfully” has the same definition as it has in Section 7 of the Penal Code. This subdivision is intended to be a codification of existing law.

(f) This section does not prohibit a prosecution under Section 192 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 222.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

6426.

Whoever knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained pursuant to this division shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than seventy thousand dollars ($70,000), or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 599, Sec. 3.   Effective October 7, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6427.

(a) Any employer who violates any occupational safety or health standard, order, or special order, or Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, and the violation is specifically determined not to be of a serious nature, may be assessed a civil penalty of up to twelve thousand four hundred seventy-one dollars ($12,471) for each violation.

(b) Commencing on January 1, 2018, and each January 1 thereafter, the maximum penalty amount specified in this section shall be increased based on the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), not seasonally adjusted, for the month of October immediately preceding the date of the adjustment, as compared to the prior year’s October CPI-U. Any regulation
 issued pursuant to this section increasing penalty amounts based on the annual increase in the CPI-U shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except that the regulation shall be filed with the Office of Administrative Law for publication in the California Code of Regulations. Any penalty shall be calculated using the penalty amounts in effect during the calendar year in which the citation was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 28, Sec. 30.   (SB 96)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6428.

Any employer who violates any occupational safety or health standard, order, or special order, or Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, if that violation is a serious violation, shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each violation. Employers who do not have an operative injury prevention program shall receive no adjustment for good faith of the employer or history of previous violations as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6319.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 615, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6428.5.

An employer’s injury prevention program shall be deemed to be operative for the purposes of Sections 6427 and 6428 if it meets the criteria for substantial compliance established by the standards board pursuant to Section 6401.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1369, Sec. 13.   Effective October 2, 1989.)
-------------------------------------------

6429.

(a) (1) Any employer who willfully or repeatedly violates any occupational safety or health standard, order, or special order, or Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, or any employer who commits an enterprise-wide violation as specified in Section 6317, may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than one hundred twenty-four thousand seven hundred nine dollars ($124,709) for each violation, but in no case less than eight thousand nine hundred eight dollars ($8,908) for each willful violation.

(2) Commencing on January 1, 2018, and each January 1 thereafter, the penalty amounts specified in this section shall be increased based on the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), not seasonally adjusted, for the month of October immediately preceding the date of the adjustment, as compared to the prior year’s October CPI-U. Any regulation issued pursuant to this section increasing penalty amounts based on the annual increase in the CPI-U shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except that the regulation shall be filed with the Office of Administrative Law for publication in the California Code of Regulations. Any penalty shall be calculated using
 the penalty amounts in effect during the calendar year in which the citation was issued.

(b) Any employer who repeatedly violates any occupational safety or health standard, order, or special order, or Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, shall not receive any adjustment of a penalty assessed pursuant to this section on the basis of the regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 6319 pertaining to the good faith of the employer or the history of previous violations of the employer.

(c) The division shall preserve and maintain records of its investigations and inspections and citations for a period of not less than seven years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 336, Sec. 6.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6430.

(a) Any employer who fails to correct a violation of any occupational safety or health standard, order, or special order, or Section 25910 of the Health and Safety Code, within the period permitted for its correction shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each day during which the failure or violation continues.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), for any employer who submits a signed statement affirming compliance with the abatement terms pursuant to Section 6320, and is found upon a reinspection not to have abated the violation, any adjustment to the civil penalty based on abatement shall be rescinded and the additional civil penalty assessed for failure to abate shall not be adjusted for good faith of the employer or history of previous violations as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 6319.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any employer who submits a signed statement affirming compliance with the abatement terms pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 6320, and is found not to have abated the violation, is guilty of a public offense punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for a term not exceeding one year, or by a fine not exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment; but if the defendant is a corporation or a limited liability company the fine shall not exceed three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000). In determining the amount of the fine to be imposed under this section, the court shall consider all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the nature, circumstance, extent, and gravity of the violation, any prior history of violations by the defendant, the ability of the defendant to pay, and any other matters the court determines the interests of justice require. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent prosecution under any law that may apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 615, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6431.

(a) Any employer who violates any of the posting or recordkeeping requirements as prescribed by regulations adopted pursuant to Sections 6408 and 6410, or who fails to post any notice required by Section 3550 or 6318, shall be assessed a civil penalty of up to twelve thousand four hundred seventy-one dollars ($12,471) for each violation.

(b) Commencing on January 1, 2018, and each January 1 thereafter, the maximum penalty amount specified in this section shall be increased based on the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U), not
 seasonally adjusted, for the month of October immediately preceding the date of the adjustment, as compared to the prior year’s October CPI-U. Any regulation issued pursuant to this section increasing maximum penalty amounts based on the annual increase in the CPI-U shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except that the regulation shall be filed with the Office of Administrative Law for publication in the California Code of Regulations. Any penalty shall be calculated using the penalty amounts in effect during the calendar year in which the citation was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 485, Sec. 3.   (AB 2068)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

6432.

(a) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a “serious violation” exists in a place of employment if the division demonstrates that there is a realistic possibility that death or serious physical harm could result from the actual hazard created by the violation. The demonstration of a violation by the division is not sufficient by itself to establish that the violation is serious. The actual hazard may consist of, among other things:

(1) A serious exposure exceeding an established permissible exposure limit.

(2) The existence in the place of employment of one or more unsafe or unhealthful practices, means, methods, operations, or processes that have been adopted or are in use.

(b) (1) Before issuing a citation alleging that a violation is serious, the division shall make a reasonable attempt to determine and consider, among other things, all of the following:

(A) Training for employees and supervisors relevant to preventing employee exposure to the hazard or to similar hazards.

(B) Procedures for discovering, controlling access to, and correcting the hazard or similar hazards.

(C) Supervision of employees exposed or potentially exposed to the hazard.

(D) Procedures for communicating to employees about the employer’s health and safety rules and programs.

(E) Information that the
 employer wishes to provide, at any time before citations are issued, including, any of the following:

(i) The employer’s explanation of the circumstances surrounding the alleged violative events.

(ii) Why the employer believes a serious violation does not exist.

(iii) Why the employer believes its actions related to the alleged violative events were reasonable and responsible so as to rebut, pursuant to subdivision (c), any presumption established pursuant to subdivision (a).

(iv) Any other information that the employer wishes to provide.

(2) The division shall satisfy its requirement to determine and consider the facts specified in paragraph (1) if, not less than 15 days prior to issuing
 a citation for a serious violation, the division delivers to the employer a standardized form containing the alleged violation descriptions (“AVD”) it intends to cite as serious and clearly soliciting the information specified in this subdivision. The director shall prescribe the form for the alleged violation descriptions and solicitation of information. Any forms issued pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) If the division establishes a presumption pursuant to subdivision (a) that a violation is serious, the employer may rebut the presumption and establish that a violation is not serious by demonstrating that the employer did not know and could not, with the exercise of reasonable diligence, have known of the presence of the violation. The employer may accomplish
 this by demonstrating both of the following:

(1) The employer took all the steps a reasonable and responsible employer in like circumstances should be expected to take, before the violation occurred, to anticipate and prevent the violation, taking into consideration the severity of the harm that could be expected to occur and the likelihood of that harm occurring in connection with the work activity during which the violation occurred. Factors relevant to this determination include, but are not limited to, those listed in subdivision (b).

(2) The employer took effective action to eliminate employee exposure to the hazard created by the violation as soon as the violation was discovered.

(d) If the employer does not provide information in response to a division inquiry made pursuant to subdivision (b), the employer
 shall not be barred from presenting that information at the hearing and no negative inference shall be drawn. The employer may offer different information at the hearing than what was provided to the division and may explain any inconsistency, but the trier of fact may draw a negative inference from the prior inconsistent factual information. The trier of fact may also draw a negative inference from factual information offered at the hearing by the division that is inconsistent with factual information provided to the employer pursuant to subdivision (b), or from a failure by the division to provide the form setting forth the descriptions of the alleged violation and soliciting information pursuant to subdivision (b).

(e) “Serious physical harm,” as used in this part, means any injury or illness, specific or cumulative, occurring in the place of employment or in connection with any employment, that results in any of the following:

(1) Inpatient hospitalization for purposes other than medical observation.

(2) The loss of any member of the body.

(3) Any serious degree of permanent disfigurement.

(4) Impairment sufficient to cause a part of the body or the function of an organ to become permanently and significantly reduced in efficiency on or off the job, including, but not limited to, depending on the severity, second-degree or worse burns, crushing injuries including internal injuries even though skin surface may be intact, respiratory illnesses, or broken bones.

(5) Silicosis or silica-related lung cancer.

(f) Serious physical harm may be caused by a
 single, repetitive practice, means, method, operation, or process.

(g) A division safety engineer or industrial hygienist who can demonstrate, at the time of the hearing, that their division-mandated training is current shall be deemed competent to offer testimony to establish each element of a serious violation, and may offer evidence on the custom and practice of injury and illness prevention in the workplace that is relevant to the issue of whether the violation is a serious violation.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 734, Sec. 4.   (SB 20)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

6433.

The civil penalties set forth in Sections 6427 to 6431, inclusive, shall not be considered as other penalties specifically provided within the meaning of Section 6423.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6434.

(a) Any civil or administrative penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter against a school district, county board of education, county superintendent of schools, charter school, community college district, California State University, University of California, or joint powers agency performing education functions shall be deposited with the Workplace Health and Safety Revolving Fund established pursuant to Section 78.

(b) Any school district, county board of education, county superintendent of schools, charter school, community college district, California State University, University of California, or joint powers agency performing education functions may apply for a refund of their civil penalty, with interest, if all conditions previously cited have been abated, they have abated any other outstanding citation, and if they have not been cited by the division for a serious violation at the same school within two years of the date of the original violation. Funds not applied for within two years and six months of the time of the original violation shall be expended as provided for in Section 78 to assist schools in establishing effective occupational injury and illness prevention programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 135, Sec. 129.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6434.5.

(a) Any civil or administrative penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter against a public police or city, county, or special district fire department or the California Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall be deposited into the Workers’ Compensation Administration Revolving Fund established pursuant to Section 62.5.

(b) Any public police or city, county, or special district fire department or the California Department of Forestry and Fire Protection may apply for a refund of any civil or administrative penalty assessed pursuant to this chapter, with interest, if all conditions previously cited have been abated, the department has abated any other outstanding citation, and the department has not been cited by the division for a serious violation within two years of the date of the original violation. Funds received as a result of a penalty, for which a refund is not applied for within two years and six months of the time of the original violation, shall be expended in accordance with Section 78 as follows:

(1) Funds received as a result of a civil or administrative penalty imposed on a city, county, or special district fire department or the California Department of Forestry and Fire Protection shall be allocated to the California Firefighter Joint Apprenticeship Program for the purpose of establishing and maintaining effective occupational injury and illness prevention programs.

(2) Funds received as a result of a civil or administrative penalty imposed on a police department shall be allocated to the Office of Criminal Justice Planning, or any succeeding agency, for the purpose of establishing and maintaining effective occupational injury and illness prevention programs.

(c) This section does not apply to that portion of any civil or administrative penalty that is distributed directly to an aggrieved employee or employees pursuant to the provisions of Section 2699.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 141, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

6435.

(a) Any employer who violates any of the requirements of Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of this part shall be assessed a civil penalty under the appropriate provisions of Sections 6427 to 6430, inclusive.

(b) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 1987, and shall remain inoperative until January 1, 1991, at which time it shall become operative, unless a later enacted statute, which becomes effective on or before January 1, 1991, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1178, Sec. 3.   Note: This section was inoperative from Jan. 1, 1987, until Jan. 1, 1991, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6436.

The criminal complaint regarding a violation of Section 6505.5 may be brought by the Attorney General or by the district attorney or prosecuting attorney of any city, in the superior court of any county in the state with jurisdiction over the contractor or employer, by reason of the contractor’s or employer’s act or failure to act within that county. Any penalty assessed by the court shall be paid to the office of the prosecutor bringing the complaint, but if the case was referred to the prosecutor by the division, or some other governmental unit, one-half of the civil or criminal penalty assessed shall be paid to that governmental unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 449, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Temporary Variances [6450. - 6457.]

6450.

(a) Any employer may apply to the division for a temporary order granting a variance from an occupational safety or health standard. Such temporary order shall be granted only if the employer files an application which meets the requirements of Section 6451, and establishes that (1) he is unable to comply with a standard by its effective date because of unavailability of professional or technical personnel or of materials and equipment needed to come into compliance with the standard or because necessary construction or alteration of facilities cannot be completed by the effective date, (2) he is taking all available steps to safeguard his employees against the hazards covered by the standard, and (3) he has an effective program for coming into compliance with the standard as quickly as practicable.

(b) Any temporary order issued under this section shall prescribe the practices, means, methods, operations, and processes which the employer must adopt and use while the order is in effect and state in detail his program for coming into compliance with the standard. Such a temporary order may be granted only after notice to employees and an opportunity for a hearing. However, the division may issue one interim order for a temporary variance upon submission of an application showing that the employment or place of employment will be safe for employees pending a hearing on the application for a temporary variance. No temporary order may be in effect for longer than the period needed by the employer to achieve compliance with the standard or one year, whichever is shorter, except that such an order may be renewed not more than twice provided that the requirements of this section are met and an application for renewal is filed prior to the expiration date of the order. No single renewal of an order may remain in effect for longer than 180 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6451.

An application for a temporary order under Section 6450 shall contain all of the following:

(a) A specification of the standard or portion thereof from which the employer seeks a variance.

(b) A representation by the employer, supported by representations from qualified persons having firsthand knowledge of the facts represented, that he is unable to comply with the standard or portion thereof and a detailed statement of the reasons therefor.

(c) A statement of the steps he has taken and will take, with specific dates, to protect employees against the hazard covered by the standard.

(d) A statement of when he expects to be able to comply with the standard and what steps he has taken and what steps he will take, with dates specified, to come into compliance with the standard.

(e) A certification that he has informed his employees of the application by giving a copy thereof to their authorized representative, posting a statement giving a summary of the application and specifying where a copy may be examined at the place or places where notices to employees are normally posted, and by other appropriate means. A description of how employees have been informed shall be contained in the certification. The information to employees shall also inform them of their right to petition the division for a hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6452.

The division is authorized to grant a temporary variance from any standard or portion thereof whenever it determines such variance is necessary to permit an employer to participate in an experiment approved by the director designed to demonstrate or validate new and improved techniques to safeguard the health or safety of workers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6454.

The division may, in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, make such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter and to establish rules and regulations relating to the granting or denial of temporary variances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

6455.

Any employer or other person adversely affected by the granting or denial of a temporary variance may appeal to the standards board within 15 working days from receipt of the notice granting or denying the variance. The 15-day period may be extended by the standards board for good cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6456.

A decision of the standards board on a variance appeal is binding on the director and the division with respect to the parties involved in the particular appeal. The director shall have the right to seek judicial review of a standards board decision irrespective of whether he appeared or participated in the appeal to the standards board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6457.

The standards board shall conduct hearings and render decisions on appeals of decisions of the division relating to allowance or denial of temporary variances. All board decisions on such variance appeals shall be in writing and shall be final except for any rehearing or judicial review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Permit Requirements [6500. - 6510.]

6500.

(a) For those employments or places of employment that by their nature involve a substantial risk of injury, the division shall require the issuance of a permit prior to the initiation of any practices, work, method, operation, or process of employment. The permit requirement of this section is limited to employment or places of employment that are any of the following:

(1) Construction of trenches or excavations that are five feet or deeper and into which a person is required to descend.

(2) The construction of any building, structure, falsework, or scaffolding more than three stories high or the equivalent height.

(3) The demolition of any building, structure, falsework, or scaffold more than three stories high or the equivalent height.

(4) The underground use of diesel engines in work in mines and tunnels.

This subdivision does not apply to motion picture, television, or theater stages or sets, including, but not limited to, scenery, props, backdrops, flats, greenbeds, and grids.

(b) On or after January 1, 2000, this subdivision shall apply to motion picture, television, or theater stages or sets, if there has occurred within any one prior calendar year in any combination at separate locations three serious injuries, fatalities, or serious violations related to the construction or demolition of sets more than 36 feet in height for the motion picture, television, and theatrical production industry.

An annual permit shall be required for employers who construct or dismantle motion picture, television, or theater stages or sets that are more than three stories or the equivalent height. A single permit shall be required under this subdivision for each employer, regardless of the number of locations where the stages or sets are located. An employer with a currently valid annual permit issued under this subdivision shall not be required to provide notice to the division prior to commencement of any work activity authorized by the permit. The division may adopt procedures to permit employers to renew by mail the permits issued under this subdivision. For purposes of this subdivision, “motion picture, television, or theater stages or sets” include, but are not limited to, scenery, props, backdrops, flats, greenbeds, and grids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.

Any employer subject to Section 6500 shall apply to the division for a permit pursuant to Section 6500. Such application for a permit shall contain such information as the division may deem necessary to evaluate the safety of the proposed employment or place of employment.

An application by an employer shall include a provision that the applicant has knowledge of applicable occupational safety and health standards and will comply with such standards and any other lawful order of the division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 993.)
-------------------------------------------

6501.5.

Effective January 1, 1987, any employer or contractor who engages in asbestos-related work, as defined in Section 6501.8, and which involves 100 square feet or more of surface area of asbestos-containing material, shall register with the division.

The division may grant registration based on a determination that the employer has demonstrated evidence that the conditions, practices, means, methods, operations, or processes used, or proposed to be used, will provide a safe and healthful place of employment. This section is not intended to supersede existing laws and regulations under Title 8, California Administrative Code, Section 5208.

An application for registration shall contain such information and attachments, given under penalty of perjury, as the division may deem necessary to evaluate the safety and health of the proposed employment or place of employment. It shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(a) Every employer shall meet each of the following criteria:

(1) If the employer is a contractor, the contractor shall be certified pursuant to Section 7058.5 of the Business and Professions Code.
